District of Columbia statutes.
31-3108

Notification of coverage and benefits.

All individual and group health benefit plans shall contain statements, in easily readable type and in easily understandable language, approved by the Commissioner, to inform policyholders and beneficiaries of the coverage and benefits provided or offered pursuant to this chapter.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-195, § 9, 34 DCR 491
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(w), 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-242, § 2(f), 54 DCR 601
This section is referenced in § 31-3110.
1981 Ed., § 35-2308.
D.C. Law 16-242 substituted “health benefit plans” for “health insurance policies”.